District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1602

Fornication.

Repealed.

History

June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 99, ch. 150, § 214
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 7, 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1002.
1973 Ed., § 22-1002.